Utah statutes.
78B-1-209.   Waiver of right to interpreter.

The right of a hearing-impaired person to an interpreter may not be waived, except by a hearing-impaired person who requests a waiver in writing.  The waiver is subject to the approval of counsel to the hearing-impaired person, if existent, and is subject to the approval of the appointing authority.  In no event may the failure of the hearing-impaired person to request an interpreter be considered a waiver of that right.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 3, 2008 General Session

